Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202644-4609
Pharmacy benefit manager; 340B entity; 340B contract pharmacy; treatment; discrimination, prohibited.

(1) A pharmacy benefit manager that reimburses a 340B entity or a 340B contract pharmacy for a drug that is subject to an agreement under 42 U.S.C. 256b shall not reimburse the 340B entity or the 340B contract pharmacy for the pharmacy-dispensed drug at a rate lower than that paid for the same drug to similarly situated pharmacies that are not 340B entities or 340B contract pharmacies, and shall not assess any fee, chargeback, or other adjustment upon the 340B entity or 340B contract pharmacy on the basis that the 340B entity or 340B contract pharmacy participates in the program set forth in 42 U.S.C. 256b.

(2) A pharmacy benefit manager shall not discriminate against a 340B entity or 340B contract pharmacy in a manner that prevents or interferes with a covered individual's choice to receive such drug from the corresponding 340B entity or 340B contract pharmacy.

(3) For purposes of this section:

(a) 340B contract pharmacy means any pharmacy under contract with a 340B entity to dispense drugs on behalf of such 340B entity; and

(b) 340B entity means an entity participating in the federal 340B drug discount program, as described in 42 U.S.C. 256b.

Laws 2022, LB767, § 9.